District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.14

District Department of Transportation Parking Meter Pay-by-Phone Transaction Fee Fund.

(a)

There is established the District Department of Transportation Parking Meter Pay- by-Phone Transaction Fee Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of the District Department of Transportation and used by the District Department of Transportation to pay the vendor responsible for maintaining the parking meter pay-by-phone payment system.

(b)

Notwithstanding § 50-2603(8), all transaction fees added to the parking meter fees imposed upon users who pay for parking with the pay-by-phone system shall be deposited into the Fund beginning October 1, 2012.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9f
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 6002, 59 DCR 8025
This section is referenced in § 50-921.04 and § 50-2603.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.